Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Nomination by Primary Election

Applied

in

Blomquist v. Thomson, 591 F. Supp. 768, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19379 (D. Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 203 to 264.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 178 to 259.

§ 22-5-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to the date of primary elections.

§ 22-5-202.
Major political party participation; separate ballots; same time.

Major political parties shall participate in the primary election and each shall have a separate party ballot. The primary election of major political parties shall be held at the same time and at the same polling places and shall be conducted by the same election officials.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-56; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-5-203.
Nonpartisan judicial offices; separate ballot; same time.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2; ch. 94, § 4.

A separate ballot shall be used for the nonpartisan primary election which shall be held at the same time and at the same polling places and shall be conducted by the same election officials as the partisan primary election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-57; Laws 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 2; ch. 94, § 4.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment by ch. 42, § 2, repealed former (a), which read: “Candidates for the nonpartisan office of justice of the peace shall be nominated only by nonpartisan primary election.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment by ch. 94, § 4, also repealed former (a).

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 22-5-204.
Application for nomination or election; party registration; form.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

An eligible person seeking nomination or election for a partisan office shall:

Meet all applicable qualifications to be elected to office which are set forth in the United States and Wyoming constitutions;

Be registered in the party whose nomination he seeks; and

File an application in substantially the following form:

APPLICATION FOR NOMINATION OR ELECTION BY PARTY PRIMARY State of Wyoming County of ss I, , swear or affirm that I was born on , (year), that I have been a resident of the state of Wyoming since , and that I am a registered voter of Election District No. , in Precinct No. , residing at , in County of , (if for the office of state senator or representative) in Senate (House) District , state of Wyoming, and registered as a member of party, (if for the office of governor) and that I resided at the physical residential addresses listed below during the past five (5) years, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official party ballot at the next primary election as a candidate for the office of , and hereby declare that if nominated and elected, I will qualify for the office. (If for the office of United States senator or representative in congress) I have not, at any time when knowingly seeking nomination or election to this office, claimed or been currently claiming any residence or received the benefits of residency from any other state, excluding the benefits of residency related to or incidental from maintaining a residence at or near the United States capital. (If for the office of governor) I have resided at the following physical residential addresses during the past five (5) years: (Residence) (Date) 1. 2. Dated the day of , (year). (Signature)

Click to view

A nomination application that is required to be filed with the secretary of state may be electronically filed as provided under W.S.

9-2-2501

if the application is accompanied by the proper filing fee.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-58; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 5; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 1999, ch. 49, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2019 ch. 4, § 1, effective February 13, 2019; 2021 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “(Residence Address)” at the end of the form in (b).

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), added “(i) Meet all applicable qualifications to be elected to office which are set forth in the United States and Wyoming constitutions;”; in (ii) added a semi-colon after “seeks” and deleted “shall”; in (iii) added “(if for the office of governor) and that I resided at the physical residential addresses listed below during the past five (5) years,” and added “(If for the office of governor) I have resided at the following physical residential addresses during the past five (5) years:”.

Laws 2019, ch. 4, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2019.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "(If for the office of United States senator or representative in congress) I have not, at any time when knowingly seeking nomination or election to this office, claimed or been currently claiming any residence or received the benefits of residency from any other state, excluding the benefits of residency related to or incidental from maintaining a residence at or near the United States capital" in (b)(iii).

Provisions mandatory. —

The provisions of a statute known as the “Australian Ballot Law,” requiring certificates of nominations of candidates for office to be made and filed to entitle the names of such candidates to be printed on the official ballot, are mandatory. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Substantial compliance. —

Certificate of nomination and affidavits of officers of the convention thereto which are intelligible, and sufficient to convey to the mind of the inquirer the information required by such instruments, though defective in form, are not void in absence of any provision indicating an intent by the legislature that statute prescribing what certificate should contain, and how it should be verified, is so mandatory that a defect incapable of affecting the regular and orderly conduct or result of an election should invalidate it. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Certificate of nomination is not fatally defective because it fails to show for what house of representatives the nomination was made, since it would seem that there could be no misunderstanding in regard thereto after the same was filed in the office of the clerk of the proper county. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Withdrawal. —

One who files with secretary of state request that his name be placed on primary ballot as candidate for secretary of state has right to withdraw his name, and upon secretary of state refusing to recognize and make such withdrawal, mandamus will issue to compel him to do so. State ex rel. Rogers v. Hunt, 53 Wyo. 267, 81 P.2d 883,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1938).

Stated

in

Murphy v. State Canvassing Bd., 12 P.3d 677,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

United States v. Tarver, 642 F. Supp. 1109, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20838 (D. Wyo. 1986).

§ 22-5-205.
Nomination application form for nonpartisan office.

An eligible person seeking nomination for a nonpartisan office must file an application in substantially the following form:

APPLICATION FOR NOMINATION BY NONPARTISAN PRIMARY State of Wyoming County of ss I, , swear or affirm that I was born on , that I have been a resident of the State of Wyoming since , and that I am a registered voter of County, residing at , and that I am eligible to be elected to such office, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official nonpartisan ballot at the next primary election as a candidate for the office indicated below as follows: (Name of office) I am seeking (1) the regular term or (2) the unexpired term which terminates on the day of , (year). Dated this day of , (year). Signature

Click to view

A nomination application that is required to be filed with the secretary of state may be electronically filed as provided under W.S.

9-2-2501

if the application is accompanied by the proper filing fee.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-60; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 1999, ch. 49, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, 1; ch. 94, § 2.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, in (a) substituted “(Name of office)” for “Justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 94 § 2, in (a) also substituted “(Name of office)” for “Justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 22-5-206.
Where nomination applications to be filed.

Nomination applications for United States senators and representatives in congress, state offices, members of the legislature, circuit court judges, and state district court judges shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

Applications for other offices that are to appear on the ballot in the county, including district attorneys, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the person filing for nomination resides.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-61; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Filing in new county. —

Nomination papers by a candidate for precinct committeeman where precinct is in a new county in process of organization should be filed with the provisional clerk of that county. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

Cited

in

Murphy v. State Canvassing Bd., 12 P.3d 677,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2000).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “Applications for other offices that are to appear on the ballot in the county” for “Other applications.”

§ 22-5-207.
Furnishing of application forms.

The secretary of state and county clerks shall provide the application form required to be filed in their respective offices.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-62; Laws 2001, ch. 116, § 1.

§ 22-5-208.
Filing fees; exception.

Applications shall be accompanied by the following fees:

One hundred dollars ($100.00) for the offices of state senator, state representative, district attorney and for the offices to be voted for by electors wholly within a county;

Three hundred dollars ($300.00) for offices to be voted for by electors of the entire state except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for any federal office voted for by electors of the entire state.

No application is valid unless the fee is paid.

A filing fee shall not be required of candidates for special district director, school district trustee, community college trustee, precinct committeeman or precinct committeewoman.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-63; Laws 1992, ch. 1, § 5; 1993, ch. 146, § 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

rewrote (c) which read: “A filing fee shall not be required of candidates for precinct committeeman and committeewomen.”

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "One hundred dollars ($100.00)" for "Twenty-five dollars ($25.00)" in (a)(i); in (a)(ii), substituted "Three hundred dollars ($300.00)" for "Two hundred dollars ($200.00)," added "except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection"; and added (a)(iii).

Cited

in

Murphy v. State Canvassing Bd., 12 P.3d 677,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and effect of statutes exacting filing fees from candidates for public office, 89 ALR2d 864.

§ 22-5-209.
Time for filing nomination applications; certified list.

An application for nomination shall be filed not more than ninety-six (96) days and not later than eighty-one (81) days next preceding the primary election. Not later than sixty-eight (68) days before a primary election the secretary of state shall transmit to each county clerk a certified list of persons whose applications have been filed in the office of the secretary of state stating as to each his name, age, address, office sought and party affiliation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-64; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computation of time, see § 22-2-210.

Day upon which computation begins must be “before” or “next preceding” day of election.

State ex rel. Johnson v. Gage, 373 P.2d 958,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1962).

And election day not considered. —

Any reasonable interpretation of the meaning of “next” could not possibly mean to include the day of election as a day to be considered in the computation. State ex rel. Johnson v. Gage, 373 P.2d 958,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1962).

Application held not timely. —

A nomination application filed on July 12 for an election on August 21 was not timely. State ex rel. Johnson v. Gage, 373 P.2d 958,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1962).

Mandamus not granted to compel acceptance of untimely application. —

Where the application to be a candidate was filed less than 40 (now 74) days next preceding the primary election, it was not timely filed; and mandamus to compel acceptance of the application could not be granted. State ex rel. Johnson v. Thomson, 499 P.2d 590,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1972).

Secretary of state's duty. —

Secretary of state, in certifying nominations to the county clerks, may respect the designation of a political party or principle mentioned in a certificate of nomination by electors where the certificate is signed, sworn to and presented by the state chairman of such party, in absence of any other nomination by such party for the same office; and he is not required to add to or disregard description, found in the certificate, indicating the manner in which the nomination was made, in the absence of any law limiting party nominations. State ex rel. Blydenburg v. Burdick, 6 Wyo. 448, 46 P. 854,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1896).

Where two nominees of the convention of the People's Party declined and substitutes were nominated by certificate of 100 electors, as permitted by Laws 1890, ch. 80, § 88, the certificate being signed, sworn to and presented by the state chairman of the party, the secretary of state was not required to place some such word as “Independent,” or “Electors,” after the names of such substitutes, to indicate that they were nominated by certificate, there being no other nomination by that party for the same office. State ex rel. Blydenburg v. Burdick, 6 Wyo. 448, 46 P. 854,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1896).

§§ 22-5-210 and 22-5-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to distribution of necessary supplies for an election and the procedure for conducting elections.

§ 22-5-212.
When declaration of party affiliation required.

An elector requesting a major party ballot must declare his party affiliation, or sign an application for change of affiliation before he may receive a party ballot. An elector may vote only the nonpartisan ballot and if so, is not required to declare his party affiliation. Requesting a partisan primary election ballot constitutes a declaration of party affiliation. A change in declaration of party affiliation shall be entered on the poll list by the election judge.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-67; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “and the registry list, which may be one and the same” following “poll list”, and substituted “election judge” for “county clerk.”

Stated

in

Murphy v. State Canvassing Bd., 12 P.3d 677,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 22-5-213.
Entry in pollbook.

The judges of election shall check or enter in the pollbook the name of each elector voting in the primary election and his party affiliation, if declared. An elector voting only a nonpartisan ballot shall be entered in the pollbook as an unaffiliated voter.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-68; 2010, ch. 3, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “an unaffiliated” for “a nonpartisan.”

§ 22-5-214.
Change in party affiliation.

An elector may change his party affiliation by completing an application signed before a notarial officer or election official, and filing it with the county clerk not less than fourteen (14) days before the primary election or at the polls on the day of the primary or general election, or when requesting an absentee ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S 1957, § 22.1-69; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary.”

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “fourteen (14)” for “thirty (30)”.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “not less than” for “not later than.”

§ 22-5-215.
Nomination of partisan candidates and write-in candidates.

On each party ballot the candidate or candidates equal in number to the number to be elected to each office who receive the largest number of votes shall be nominated and shall be entitled to have their names printed on the ballot for the next general election. A write-in candidate shall not be nominated and shall not be entitled to have his name printed on the ballot for the next general election unless he received at least twenty-five (25) write-in votes in the primary election and is a registered voter in the political party for which he was nominated on the day of the primary election. An unsuccessful candidate for office at a primary election whose name is printed on any party ballot may not accept nomination for the same office at the next general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-70; Laws 1989, ch. 25, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Write-in candidate. —

A person who was defeated in a primary election as a candidate of one party, but who simultaneously received sufficient write-in votes in the separate primary election of the other party, has the right to appear on the general election ballot since the Election Code does not specifically prohibit such a result. Murphy v. State Canvassing Bd., 12 P.3d 677,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2000).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “write-in votes in the primary election and is a registered voter in the political party for which he was nominated on the day of the primary election” for “write-in votes.”

§ 22-5-216.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 38, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, W.S. 1957, § 22.1-71, Laws 1981, ch. 159, § 1, 1998, ch. 100, § 2, 2007, ch. 39, § 1, related to nomination of nonpartisan candidates.

§ 22-5-217.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1, provided that the candidates who receive the largest number of votes for each office are elected.

§ 22-5-218.
Election of major party precinct committeemen and committeewomen.

The candidates equal in number to the number of offices to be filled receiving the greatest number of votes on each party ballot for the offices of major party precinct committeeman and committeewoman shall be deemed elected.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-72; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-5-219.
Further action by nominees or elect not required; exception.

Candidates nominated and major party precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected at a primary election shall be deemed nominated or elected without further action. In addition, each write-in candidate nominated at a primary election shall comply with the provisions of W.S.

22-16-106

.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-73; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1977, ch. 186, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2005, ch. 100, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “with the exception of the filing requirements of W.S.

22-25-106

” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “or elected” following “candidate nominated” in the second sentence.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

For amount of filing fees, see §

22-5-208

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Elections: validity of state or local legislative ban on write-in votes, 69 ALR4th 948.

§ 22-5-220.
Withdrawal of nomination application restricted.

A candidate may withdraw a nomination application prior to the primary election only by filing a written withdrawal in the filing office in which he filed his application for nomination. If a candidate withdraws after the party ballots are finalized and approved for printing by a county clerk in any county where the candidate’s name will appear on the party ballot, the county clerk shall not be required to remove the candidate’s name from the party ballot, but shall post a notice at each polling place announcing that the named candidate has withdrawn from nomination for the office designated.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 100, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 100, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.